Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 199. Defamation

§ 5771.
Defamation action; attorney’s fees.

If judgment is rendered for a defendant in a defamation action and the court finds that the action was frivolous and without merit, the court may award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the defendant.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.).